Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.200

Liquidation account—Determination of subaccount balances.

The initial subaccount balance for a savings account held by an eligible account holder and/or supplemental eligible account holder shall be determined by multiplying the opening balance in the liquidation account by a fraction of which the numerator is the amount of qualifying deposits in the savings account on the eligibility record date and/or the supplemental eligibility record date and the denominator is the total amount of qualifying deposits of all eligible account holders and supplemental eligible account holders in the converting savings bank on these dates. For savings accounts in existence at both dates, separate subaccounts shall be determined on the basis of the qualifying deposits in these savings accounts on these record dates. The initial subaccount balances shall not be increased, and it shall be subject to downward adjustment as provided in RCW 32.32.205.

[ 1981 c 85 s 39.]